Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1810.04
Registered dietitian or registered dietitian nutritionist, defined.

Registered dietitian or registered dietitian nutritionist means a person who is currently registered as a registered dietitian or a registered dietitian nutritionist by the Commission on Dietetic Registration of the Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics or a similar successor entity approved by the department.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 39.